Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1147.
do enact as follows:SB1147,13Section 1. 631.84 of the statutes is created to read:SB1147,2,11631.84 Limitation on retroactive denials. (1) In this section:SB1147,2,22(a) “Disability insurance policy” has the meaning given in s. 632.895 (1) (a).SB1147,2,73(b) “Retroactive denial of payment” means any attempt by an insurer to 4retroactively collect payments already made for a claimant with respect to a claim 5by requiring repayment of such payments, by reducing other payments owed to the 6claimant, by withholding or setting off against future payments to the claimant, or 7in any other manner reducing or affecting future claim payments to the claimant.SB1147,2,88(c) “Third-party payer” means any of the following:SB1147,2,991. A disability insurance policy.SB1147,2,11102. A health maintenance organization, preferred provider plan, or limited 11service health organization under ch. 609.SB1147,2,13123. A health care coverage plan offered by the state under s. 40.51 (6) or by the 13group insurance board under s. 40.51 (7).SB1147,2,15144. A self-insured health plan of the state or a county, city, village, town, or 15school district.SB1147,2,17165. A health care plan operated by a cooperative association organized under s. 17185.981.SB1147,2,19186. Any other person that is obligated by contract to provide reimbursement for 19covered health care services rendered to beneficiaries under the contract.SB1147,2,2320(2) Except as provided in sub. (3), an insurer may only impose a retroactive 21denial of payment for a claim under a disability insurance policy during the 12-22month period following the date that the insurer initially provided reimbursement 23for the claim.SB1147,3,51(3) If a claim was subject to coordination of benefits with another 3rd-party 2payer, the Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49, or the federal 3Medicare program, an insurer may only impose a retroactive denial of payment for 4the claim under a disability insurance policy during the 18-month period following 5the date that the insurer initially provided reimbursement for the claim.SB1147,3,86(4) This section does not apply to any retroactive denial of payment for a claim 7if an insurer retroactively denied payment for the claim because information 8submitted to the insurer to support the claim was fraudulent.SB1147,29Section 2. Initial applicability.SB1147,3,1210(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, the 11act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 12subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).SB1147,3,1713(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 14agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, the act first applies to 15policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 16on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 17modified, or renewed, whichever is later.SB1147,3,1818